Washington statutes.
RCW 5.50.010

Definitions.

In this chapter:

(1) "Law" includes a statute, judicial decision or order, rule of court, executive order, and administrative rule, regulation, or order.

(2) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(3) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol;

(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

(c) To affix or place the declarant's signature as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 on the record;

(d) To affix or logically associate the declarant's signature in the manner described in general rule 30 to the record if he or she is a licensed attorney; or

(e) To affix or logically associate the declarant's full name, department or agency, and badge or personnel number to any record that is electronically submitted to a court, a prosecutor, or a magistrate from an electronic device that is owned, issued, or maintained by a criminal justice agency if the declarant is a law enforcement officer.

(4) "Sworn declaration" means a declaration in a signed record given under oath. The term includes a sworn statement, verification, certificate, and affidavit.

(5) "Unsworn declaration" means a declaration in a signed record not given under oath but given under penalty of perjury. The term includes an unsworn statement, verification, and certificate.

[ 2020 c 57 s 22; 2019 c 232 s 1; 2011 c 22 s 2.]

NOTES: